Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7722.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-18-63 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-18 entitled "Accident
and Sickness Insurance Policies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-18-63. Dental insurance assignment of benefits.
(a) Every entity providing a policy of accident and sickness insurance as defined in this
chapter shall allow, as a provision in a group or individual policy, contract, or health benefit plan
for coverage of dental services, any person insured by such entity to direct, in writing, that benefits
from a health benefit plan, policy, or contract, be paid directly to a dental care provider who has
not contracted with the entity to provide dental services to persons covered by the entity but
otherwise meets the credentialing criteria of the entity and has not previously been terminated by
such entity as a participating provider. If written direction to pay is executed and written notice of
the direction to pay is provided to such entity, the insuring entity shall pay the benefits directly to
the dental care provider. Any efforts to modify the amount of benefits paid directly to the dental
care provider under this section may include a reduction in benefits paid of no more than five
percent (5%) less than the benefits paid to participating dentists. The entity paying the dentist,
pursuant to a direction to pay duly executed by the subscriber, shall have the right to review the
records of the dentist receiving such payment that relate exclusively to that particular
subscriber/patient to determine that the service in question was rendered. Any entity as defined and
licensed in this chapter shall allow, as a provision in any group or individual policy, contract, or

health benefit plan for coverage of dental services, any person insured by the entity to direct, in
writing, that their benefits, and the corresponding reimbursement to the dental care provider for
covered services, from a health benefit plan, policy, or contract be paid directly to any dental care
provider who has or has not contracted with the entity.
(b) Upon receipt of a duly executed written direction to pay and written notice thereof, the
entity shall pay the benefits and compensation directly to the dental care provider. The amount of
benefits paid under this section shall be no less than the highest reimbursement amount actually
paid to any participating provider for the same covered dental service, as listed in the entity's benefit
allowance tables or fee schedules, including any incentive-based or performance-tiered schedules.
(c) In cases where multiple tiers or schedules exist, the applicable benchmark shall be the
highest reimbursement amount listed for that procedure code among all participating provider
categories.
(d) The entity shall not use tiered reimbursement structures, geographic modifiers, or
network classifications to reduce the benchmark amount for purposes of calculating payment under
this section. The entity shall not create or designate new provider categories or reimbursement tiers
for the purpose of reducing the benchmark amount under this section.
(e) The entity shall not reduce, modify, or condition the benefit amount based on the
provider's non-participation. The entity may review the provider's records related exclusively to the
subscriber/patient to verify that the service was rendered and to verify such treatment meets the
entity's criteria for benefit payment.
(f) Provided, however, this section shall not apply to insurance coverage providing benefits
for:
(1) Hospital confinement indemnity;
(2) Disability income;
(3) Accident only;
(4) Long-term care;
(5) Medicare supplement;
(6) Limited benefit health;
(7) Specified disease indemnity;
(8) Sickness or bodily injury or death by accident or both; and
(9) Other limited benefit policies.
SECTION 2. Section 27-19-54 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-19 entitled "Nonprofit
Hospital Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-19-54. Dental insurance assignment of benefits.
LC005036 - Page 2 of 6

(a) Every entity providing a contract of insurance subject to this chapter shall allow, as a
provision in a group or individual policy, contract, or health benefit plan for coverage of dental
services, any person insured by the entity to direct, in writing, that benefits from a health benefit
plan, policy, or contract be paid directly to a dental care provider who has not contracted with the
entity to provide dental services to persons covered by the entity but otherwise meets the
credentialing criteria of the entity and has not previously been terminated by the entity as a
participating provider. If written direction to pay is executed and written notice of the direction to
pay is provided to the entity, the insuring entity shall pay the benefits directly to the dental care
provider. Any efforts to modify the amount of benefits paid directly to the dental care provider
under this section may include a reduction in benefits paid of no more than five percent (5%) less
than the benefits paid to participating dentists. The entity paying the dentist, pursuant to a direction
to pay duly executed by the subscriber, shall have the right to review the records of the dentist
receiving the payment that relate exclusively to that particular subscriber/patient to determine that
the service in question was rendered. Any entity as defined and licensed in this chapter shall allow,
as a provision in any group or individual policy, contract, or health benefit plan for coverage of
dental services, any person insured by the entity to direct, in writing, that their benefits, and the
corresponding reimbursement to the dental care provider for covered services, from a health benefit
plan, policy, or contract be paid directly to any dental care provider who has or has not contracted
with the entity.
(b) Upon receipt of a duly executed written direction to pay and written notice thereof, the
entity shall pay the benefits and compensation directly to the dental care provider. The amount of
benefits paid under this section shall be no less than the highest reimbursement amount actually
paid to any participating provider for the same covered dental service, as listed in the entity's benefit
allowance tables or fee schedules, including any incentive-based or performance-tiered schedules.
(c) In cases where multiple tiers or schedules exist, the applicable benchmark shall be the
highest reimbursement amount listed for that procedure code among all participating provider
categories.
(d) The entity shall not use tiered reimbursement structures, geographic modifiers, or
network classifications to reduce the benchmark amount for purposes of calculating payment under
this section. The entity shall not create or designate new provider categories or reimbursement tiers
for the purpose of reducing the benchmark amount under this section.
(e) The entity shall not reduce, modify, or condition the benefit amount based on the
provider's non-participation. The entity may review the provider's records related exclusively to the
subscriber/patient to verify that the service was rendered and to verify such treatment meets the
LC005036 - Page 3 of 6

entity's criteria for benefit payment.
SECTION 3. Section 27-41-66 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-41 entitled "Health
Maintenance Organizations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-41-66. Dental insurance assignment of benefits.
(a) Every entity licensed under this chapter shall allow, as a provision of any evidence of
coverage of dental services, any person covered by the entity to direct, in writing, that benefits from
a health benefit plan, policy, or contract, be paid directly to a dental care provider who has not
contracted with the entity to provide dental services to persons covered by the entity but otherwise
meets the credentialing criteria of the entity and has not previously been terminated by the entity
as a participating provider. If written direction to pay is executed and written notice of the direction
to pay is provided to the entity, the insuring entity shall pay the benefits directly to the dental care
provider. Any efforts to modify the amount of benefits paid directly to the dental care provider
under this section may include a reduction in benefits paid of no more than five percent (5%) less
than the benefits paid to participating dentists. The entity paying the dentist, pursuant to a direction
to pay duly executed by the subscriber, shall have the right to review the records of the dentist
receiving such payment that relate exclusively to that particular subscriber/patient to determine that
the service in question was rendered. Any entity as defined and licensed in this chapter shall allow,
as a provision in any group or individual policy, contract, or health benefit plan for coverage of
dental services, any person insured by the entity to direct, in writing, that their benefits, and the
corresponding reimbursement to the dental care provider for covered services, from a health benefit
plan, policy, or contract be paid directly to any dental care provider who has or has not contracted
with the entity.
(b) Upon receipt of a duly executed written direction to pay and written notice thereof, the
entity shall pay the benefits and compensation directly to the dental care provider. The amount of
benefits paid under this section shall be no less than the highest reimbursement amount actually
paid to any participating provider for the same covered dental service, as listed in the entity's benefit
allowance tables or fee schedules, including any incentive-based or performance-tiered schedules.
(c) In cases where multiple tiers or schedules exist, the applicable benchmark shall be the
highest reimbursement amount listed for that procedure code among all participating provider
categories.
(d) The entity shall not use tiered reimbursement structures, geographic modifiers, or
network classifications to reduce the benchmark amount for purposes of calculating payment under
this section. The entity shall not create or designate new provider categories or reimbursement tiers
for the purpose of reducing the benchmark amount under this section.
LC005036 - Page 4 of 6

(e) The entity shall not reduce, modify, or condition the benefit amount based on the
provider's non-participation. The entity may review the provider's records related exclusively to the
subscriber/patient to verify that the service was rendered and to verify such treatment meets the
entity's criteria for benefit payment.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC005036
========
LC005036 - Page 5 of 6